California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 28100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150), Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 28300) do not apply to any sale, delivery, or transfer of firearms made to an authorized law enforcement representative of any city, county, city and county, or state, or of the federal government, for exclusive use by that governmental agency if, prior to the sale, delivery, or transfer of these firearms, written authorization from the head of the agency authorizing the transaction is presented to the person from whom the purchase, delivery, or transfer is being made.

(b) Proper written authorization is defined as verifiable written certification from
 the head of the agency by which the purchaser or transferee is employed, identifying the employee as an individual authorized to conduct the transaction, and authorizing the transaction for the exclusive use of the agency by which that person is employed.

(c) Within 10 days of the date a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is acquired by the agency, a record of the same shall be entered as an institutional weapon into the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 59.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

28405.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 28100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150), Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 28300) do not apply to the loan of a firearm if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The loan is made by an authorized law enforcement representative of a city, county, or city and county, or of the state or federal government.

(b) The loan is made to a peace officer employed by that agency and authorized to carry a firearm.

(c) The loan is made for the carrying and use of that firearm by that peace officer in
 the course and scope of the officer’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28410.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 28100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150), Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 28300) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a peace officer pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred pursuant to Section 10334 of the Public Contract Code to that peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into the Automated
 Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 60.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

28415.

(a) Article 1 (commencing with Section 28100), Article 2 (commencing with Section 28150), Article 3 (commencing with Section 28200), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 28300) do not apply to the sale, delivery, or transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to a retiring peace officer who is authorized to carry a firearm pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 26300) of Division 5.

(b) Within 10 days of the date that a handgun, and commencing January 1, 2014, any firearm, is sold, delivered, or transferred to that retiring peace officer, the name of the officer and the make, model, serial number, and other identifying characteristics of the firearm being sold, delivered, or transferred shall be entered into
 the Automated Firearms System (AFS) via the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) by the law enforcement or state agency that sold, delivered, or transferred the firearm, provided, however, that if the firearm is not a handgun and does not have a serial number, identification number, or identification mark assigned to it, that fact shall be noted in AFS. Any agency without access to AFS shall arrange with the sheriff of the county in which the agency is located to input this information via this system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 61.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Centralized List of Exempted Federal Firearms Licensees [28450. - 28490.]

28450.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2008, the Department of Justice shall keep a centralized list of persons who identify themselves as being licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code as a dealer, importer, or manufacturer of firearms whose licensed premises are within this state and who declare to the department an exemption from the firearms dealer licensing requirements of Section 26500.

(b) The list shall be known as the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees.

(c) To qualify for placement on the centralized list, an applicant shall do all of the following:

(1) Possess a valid federal firearms license pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code as a dealer, importer, or manufacturer of firearms.

(2) Possess a current, valid certificate of eligibility pursuant to Section 26710.

(3) Maintain with the department a signed declaration enumerating the applicant’s statutory exemptions from licensing requirements of Section 26500.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28455.

Any person furnishing a fictitious name, knowingly furnishing any incorrect information, or knowingly omitting any information for the declaration under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 28450 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28460.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2008, the department shall assess an annual fee of one hundred fifteen dollars ($115) to cover its costs of maintaining the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees prescribed by Section 28450, conducting inspections in accordance with this article, and for the cost of maintaining the firearm shipment verification number system described in Section 27555.

(b) The department may increase the fee at a rate not to exceed the increase in the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) The fees collected shall be deposited in the
 Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account.

(d) A person who satisfies all of the following conditions shall not be charged a fee:

(1) The person is not licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(2) The person has been issued a permit pursuant to Section 31005, 32650, or 33300, or pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2.

(3) The person is placed on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28465.

(a) Any person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code as a dealer, importer, or manufacturer of firearms whose licensed premises are within this state shall not import or receive firearms from any source unless listed on the centralized list of firearms dealers pursuant to Section 26715, or the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees pursuant to Section 28450, or the centralized list of firearms manufacturers pursuant to Section 29060.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28470.

(a) All persons on the centralized list of exempted federal firearms licensees prescribed by Section 28450 shall record and keep on file for three years, the verification number that shall accompany firearms received from other federal firearms licensees pursuant to Section 27555.

(b) A violation of this section is cause for immediate removal from the centralized list.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28475.

Information compiled from the list described in Section 28450 shall be made available for the following purposes:

(a) Requests from local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies and the duly constituted city, county, and city and county licensing authorities.

(b) When the information is requested by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for determining the validity of the license for firearm shipments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28480.

(a) The department may conduct onsite inspections at the business premises of a person on the centralized list described in Section 28450 to determine compliance with firearms laws pursuant to the provisions listed in Section 16575.

(b) The department shall work in consultation with the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives to ensure that licensees are not subject to duplicative inspections.

(c) During the inspection the following firearm records shall be made available for review:

(1) Federal records referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 478.125 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the bound book containing the same information referred to in Section 478.124a and subdivision (e) of Section 478.125 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Verification numbers issued pursuant to Section 27555.

(3) Any other records requested by the department to determine compliance with the provisions listed in Section 16575.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 10.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

28485.

The department may remove from the centralized list described in Section 28450 any person who violates a provision listed in Section 16575.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

28490.

The department may adopt regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2, and Sections 27555 to 27570, inclusive. The department shall work in consultation with the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives to ensure that state regulations are not duplicative of federal regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 11.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 7. MANUFACTURE OF FIREARMS [29010. - 29186.]



  CHAPTER 1. License Requirement for Manufacture of Firearms [29010. - 29010.]

29010.

(a) A person shall not manufacture more than three firearms within this state in a calendar year unless that person is licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29030).

(b) If a person required to be licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29030) ceases operations, then the records required pursuant to Section 29130 and subdivision (b) of Section 29115 shall be forwarded to the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives within three days of the closure of business.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (AB 1089)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Issuance, Forfeiture, and Conditions of License to Manufacture Firearms [29030. - 29150.]



  ARTICLE 1. Preliminary Provisions [29030. - 29030.]

29030.

In this chapter, “licensee” means a person, firm, or corporation that satisfies both of the following:

(a) Has a license issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29050.

(b) Is among those recorded in the centralized list specified in Section 29060.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensing Process [29050. - 29075.]

29050.

(a) The Department of Justice shall accept applications for, and shall grant licenses permitting, the manufacture of firearms within this state.

(b) No license shall be granted by the department unless and until the applicant presents proof that the applicant has all of the following:

(1) A valid license to manufacture firearms issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(2) Any regulatory or business license required by local government.

(3) A
 valid seller’s permit or resale certificate issued by the State Board of Equalization, if applicable.

(4) A certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 26710.

(c) A license granted by the department shall be valid for no more than one year from the date of issuance and shall be in the form prescribed by the Attorney General.

(d) The department shall inform applicants who are denied licenses of the reasons for the denial in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29055.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations to administer this chapter and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29010).

(b) The department shall recover the full costs of administering the program by collecting fees from license applicants. Recoverable costs shall include, but not be limited to, the costs of inspections and maintaining a centralized list of licensed firearm manufacturers.

(c) The fee for licensed manufacturers who produce fewer than 500 firearms in a calendar year within this state shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year or the actual costs of inspections and maintaining a centralized list of
 firearm manufacturers and any other duties of the department required pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29010), whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29060.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 20965, the Department of Justice shall maintain a centralized list of all persons licensed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29050.

(b) The centralized list shall be provided annually to each police department and county sheriff within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29065.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the license of any licensee who violates this chapter may be revoked.

(b) The license of any licensee who knowingly or with gross negligence violates this chapter or violates this chapter three times shall be revoked, and that person, firm, or corporation shall become permanently ineligible to obtain a license pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Upon the revocation of the license, notification shall be provided to local law enforcement authorities in the jurisdiction where the licensee’s business is located and to the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 234.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

29070.

(a) The department shall make information concerning the location and name of a licensee available, upon request, for the following purposes only:

(1) Law enforcement.

(2) When the information is requested by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code for determining the validity of the license for firearm shipments.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall make the name and business address of a licensee available to any person upon written
 request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29075.

The Department of Justice shall maintain and make available upon request information concerning all of the following:

(a) The number of inspections conducted and the amount of fees collected pursuant to Section 29055.

(b) The number of licensees removed from the centralized list described in Sections 29060 and 29065.

(c) The number of licensees found to have violated this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prohibitions and Requirements Applicable to Licensee [29100. - 29150.]

29100.

A licensee shall comply with the prohibitions and requirements described in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29105.

The business of a licensee shall be conducted only in the buildings designated in the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29110.

A licensee shall display the license or a copy thereof, certified by the department, on the premises where it can easily be seen.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29115.

(a) Whenever a licensee discovers that a firearm has been stolen or is missing from the licensee’s premises, the licensee shall report the loss or theft within 48 hours of the discovery to all of the following:

(1) The Department of Justice, in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) The federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.

(3) The police department in the city or city and county where the building designated in the license is located.

(4) If there is no police department in the city or city and county
 where the building designated in the license is located, the sheriff of the county where the building designated in the license is located.

(b) For at least 10 years, the licensee shall maintain records of all firearms that are lost or stolen, as prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 235.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

29120.

(a) A licensee shall require that each employee obtain a certificate of eligibility pursuant to Section 26710, which shall be renewed annually, before being allowed to come into contact with any firearm.

(b) A licensee shall prohibit any employee who the licensee knows or reasonably should know is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm from coming into contact with any firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29125.

(a) Each firearm a licensee manufactures in this state shall be identified with a unique serial number stamped onto the firearm utilizing the method of compression stamping.

(b) Licensed manufacturers who produce fewer than 500 firearms in a calendar year within this state may serialize long guns only by utilizing a method of compression stamping or by engraving the serial number onto the firearm.

(c) The licensee shall stamp the serial number onto the firearm within one business day of the time the frame or receiver is manufactured.

(d) The licensee shall not use
 the same serial number for more than one firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29130.

(a) A licensee shall record the type, model, caliber, or gauge, and serial number of each firearm manufactured or acquired, and the date of the manufacture or acquisition, within one business day of the manufacture or acquisition.

(b) The licensee shall maintain permanently within the building designated in the license the records required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Backup copies of the records described in subdivision (a), whether electronic or hard copy, shall be made at least once a month. These backup records shall be maintained in a facility separate from the one in which the primary records are
 stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29135.

(a) A licensee shall allow the department to inspect the building designated in the license to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) A licensee shall allow any peace officer, authorized law enforcement employee, or Department of Justice employee designated by the Attorney General, upon the presentation of proper identification, to inspect facilities and records during business hours to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29140.

A licensee shall store in a secure facility all firearms manufactured and all barrels for firearms manufactured.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

29141.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 29142, as used in this chapter, “secure facility” means that the facility satisfies all of the following:

(a) The facility is equipped with a burglar alarm with central monitoring.

(b) All perimeter entries to areas in which firearms are stored other than doors, including windows and skylights, are secured with steel window guards or an audible, silent, or sonic alarm to detect entry.

(c) All perimeter doorways are designed in one of the following ways:

(1) A windowless steel
 security door equipped with both a deadbolt and a doorknob lock.

(2) A windowed metal door equipped with both a deadbolt and a doorknob lock. If the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window is covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.

(3) A metal grate that is padlocked and affixed to the licensee’s premises independent of the door and doorframe.

(4) Hinges and hasps attached to doors by welding, riveting, or bolting with nuts on the inside of the door.

(5) Hinges and hasps installed on doors so that they cannot be removed
 when the doors are closed and locked.

(6) (A) A windowed or windowless steel door that is equipped with panic hardware that operates a multipoint lock that bolts into the interior frame of the door.

(B) The door shall have a latch guard over the bolt closest to the primary locking bolt to protect it from prying or cutting.

(C) If the door is windowed and the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.

(d) Heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, and service openings are secured with steel bars, metal grating, or an alarm system.

(e) No perimeter metal grates are capable of being entered by any person.

(f) Steel bars used to satisfy the requirements of this section are not capable of being entered by any person.

(g) Perimeter walls of rooms in which firearms are stored are constructed of concrete or at least 10-gauge expanded steel wire mesh utilized along with typical wood frame and drywall construction. If firearms are not stored in a vault, the facility shall use an exterior security-type door along with a high security, single-key deadbolt, or other door that is more secure. All firearms shall be stored in a separate room away from any general living
 area or work area. Any door to the storage facility shall be locked while unattended.

(h) Perimeter doorways, including the loading dock area, are locked at all times when not attended by paid employees or contracted employees, including security guards.

(i) Except when a firearm is currently being tested, any ammunition on the premises is removed from all manufactured guns and stored in a separate and locked room, cabinet, or box away from the storage area for the firearms. Ammunition may be stored with a weapon only in a locked safe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 40, Sec. 2.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

29142.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, any licensed manufacturer who produces fewer than 500 firearms in a calendar year within this state may maintain a “secure facility” by complying with all of the requirements described in Section 29141, or may design a security plan that is approved by the Department of Justice or the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.

(b) If a security plan is approved by the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, the approved plan, along with proof of approval, shall be filed with the Department of Justice and the local police department. If there is no police department, the filing shall be with the county sheriff’s office.

(c) If a security plan is approved by the Department of Justice, the approved plan, along with proof of approval, shall be filed with the local police department. If there is no police department, the filing shall be with the county sheriff’s office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 236.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

29150.

(a) A licensee shall notify the chief of police or other head of the municipal police department in the city or city and county where the building designated in the license is located that the licensee is manufacturing firearms within that city or city and county and the location of the licensed premises.

(b) If there is no police department in the city or city and county where the building designated in the license is located, the licensee shall notify the sheriff of the county where the building designated in the license is located that the licensee is manufacturing firearms within that county and the location of the licensed premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assembly of Firearms [29180. - 29186.]

29180.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “manufacturing” or “assembling” a firearm means to fabricate or construct a firearm, including through additive, subtractive, or other processes, or to fit together the component parts of a firearm to construct a firearm.

(b) Before manufacturing or assembling a firearm, a person manufacturing or assembling the firearm shall, for any firearm that does not have a valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification imprinted on the frame or receiver, do all of the following:

(1) (A) Apply to the Department of Justice for a unique serial number or other mark of
 identification pursuant to Section 29182.

(B) Each application shall contain a description of the firearm that the applicant intends to assemble, the applicant’s full name, address, date of birth, and any other information that the department may deem appropriate.

(2) (A) Within 10 days of manufacturing or assembling a firearm in accordance with paragraph (1), the unique serial number or other mark of identification provided by the department shall be engraved or permanently affixed to the firearm in a manner that meets or exceeds the requirements imposed on licensed importers and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant to subsection (i) of Section 923 of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(B) If the firearm is manufactured or assembled from polymer plastic, 3.7 ounces of material type 17-4 PH stainless steel shall be embedded within the plastic upon fabrication or construction with the unique serial number engraved or otherwise permanently affixed in a manner that meets or exceeds the requirements imposed on licensed importers and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant to subsection (i) of Section 923 of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(3) After the serial number provided by the department is engraved or otherwise permanently affixed to the firearm, the person shall notify the department of that fact in a manner and within a time period specified by the department, and with sufficient information to identify
 the owner of the firearm, the unique serial number or mark of identification provided by the department, and the firearm in a manner prescribed by the department.

(c) Any person who owns a firearm or firearm precursor part that does not bear a valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification shall be deemed to be in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 23920 if they comply with all of the following:

(1) (A) By no later than January 1, 2024, or if a new resident of the state, within 60 days after arriving in the state with a firearm that does not have a valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification, apply to the Department of Justice for a unique serial number or other mark of identification pursuant to Section
 29182.

(B) An application to the department for a serial number or mark of identification for a firearm precursor part shall include, in a manner prescribed by the department, information identifying the applicant and a description of the firearm that the applicant intends to manufacture or assemble with the firearm precursor part, and any other information that the department may deem appropriate.

(2) Within 10 days of receiving a unique serial number or other mark of identification from the department,
 engrave or permanently affix that serial number or mark of identification to the firearm in accordance with regulations prescribed by the department pursuant to Section 29182 and in a manner that meets or exceeds the requirements imposed on licensed importers and licensed manufacturers of firearms pursuant to subsection (i) of Section 923 of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto. If the firearm is manufactured or assembled from polymer plastic, 3.7 ounces of material type 17-4 PH stainless steel shall be embedded within the plastic upon fabrication or construction.

(3) After the serial number provided by the department is engraved or otherwise permanently affixed to the firearm, notify the department of that fact in a manner and within a time period specified by the department
 and with sufficient information to identify the owner of the firearm, the unique serial number or mark of identification provided by the department, and the firearm in a manner prescribed by the department.

(d) (1) Except by operation of law, a person, corporation, or firm that is not a federally licensed firearms manufacturer shall not sell or transfer ownership of a firearm, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 16520, if any of the following are true:

(A) That person, corporation, or firm manufactured or assembled the firearm.

(B) That person, corporation, or firm knowingly caused the firearm to be manufactured or assembled by a person, corporation, or firm that is not a federally licensed firearms
 manufacturer.

(C) That person, corporation, or firm is aware that the firearm was manufactured or assembled by a person, corporation, or firm that is not a federally licensed firearms manufacturer.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to the transfer, surrender, or sale of a firearm to a law enforcement agency.

(3) Any firearms confiscated by law enforcement that do not bear an engraved serial number or other mark of identification pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c), or a firearm surrendered, transferred, or sold to a law enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be destroyed as provided in Section 18005.

(4) Sections 26500 and 27545, and subdivision (a) of
 Section 31615, do not apply to the transfer, sale, or surrender of firearms to a law enforcement agency pursuant to paragraph (2).

(e) A person, corporation, or firm shall not knowingly allow, facilitate, aid, or abet the manufacture or assembling of a firearm
 by a person who is within any of the classes identified by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of this code, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(f) A person, corporation, or firm shall not knowingly manufacture or assemble, or knowingly cause, allow, facilitate, aid, or abet the manufacture or assembling of, a firearm that is not imprinted with a valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification.

(g) If the firearm is a handgun, a violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. For all other firearms, a violation of this
 section is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each firearm found to be in violation of this section constitutes a distinct and separate offense. This section does not preclude prosecution under any other law providing for a greater penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 22.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29182.

(a) The Department of Justice may accept applications from, and may grant applications in the form of serial numbers pursuant to Sections 23910 and 29180 to, persons who wish to own a firearm or firearm precursor part that does not have a valid state or federal serial number or mark of
 identification.

(b) An application made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only be granted by the department if the applicant does all of the following:

(1) For each transaction, completes a firearms eligibility check pursuant to Section 28220 demonstrating that the applicant is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) Presents proof of age and identity as specified in Section 16400 demonstrating that person is 21 years of age or older.

(3) Provides a description of the firearm that the applicant owns or intends to manufacture or assemble, in a manner prescribed by the
 department.

(4) Has a valid firearm safety certificate.

(c) The department shall inform applicants who are denied an application of the reasons for the denial in writing. The reason for denial may include, without limitation, any of the following:

(1) Based on a firearm eligibility check conducted pursuant to Section 28220, the department has determined that the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(2) Based on a firearm eligibility check conducted pursuant to Section 28220, the department is unable to ascertain the disposition of an arrest or criminal charge, is unable to ascertain the outcome of
 a mental health evaluation or treatment, or otherwise is unable to conclusively determine that the applicant is not ineligible.

(3) The applicant’s description of the firearm that the applicant owns or intends to manufacture or assemble indicates that the firearm would be considered any of the following:

(A) An unsafe handgun.

(B) An assault weapon, as defined in Section 30510 or 30515.

(C) A machinegun.

(D) A .50 BMG rifle.

(E) A destructive device, as defined in Section 16460.

(F) A short-barreled rifle or short-barreled shotgun.

(G) An unconventional pistol.

(H) Any other firearm prohibited by this part.

(d) (1) All applications received on or after January 1, 2024, shall be granted or denied within 90 calendar days after the receipt of the application by the department.

(2) Any application received before January 1, 2024, may be granted or denied within a period of time prescribed by the department.

(e) (1) This chapter does not authorize a person to manufacture, assemble, or possess a weapon prohibited under Section 16590, an
 assault weapon as defined in Section 30510 or 30515, a machinegun as defined in Section 16880, a .50 BMG rifle as defined in Section 30530, or a destructive device as defined in Section 16460.

(2) This chapter does not authorize a person to manufacture or assemble an unsafe handgun, as defined in Section 31910.

(f) The department shall adopt regulations to administer this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 24.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

29183.
